Hawaii statutes.
§171-15 Drawing. Whenever public lands
are to be sold or leased by drawing, the board of land and natural resources
shall notify by publication of applications for the drawing as provided in
section 171-16 with such details concerning the drawing as it shall deem
necessary and desirable. Applications to participate in the drawing must be
filed with the board within two weeks after the last publication date. Within
forty-five days after the closing date for applications, the board shall screen
the qualifications of the applicants, select those qualified to participate,
notify all applicants of the selection and conduct a drawing. The date of the
drawing shall be published as set forth in section 171-16. The award shall be
made within one week and all applicants shall be notified of the result of the
drawing. The lease or patent shall be issued within ninety days after the
drawing or when conditions of sale are fulfilled. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2;
Supp, §103A-15; HRS §171-15]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next